Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3802
Definitions.

In the Uniform Unlawful Restrictions in Land Records Act:

(1) Amendment means a document that removes an unlawful restriction.

(2) Document means a record recorded or eligible to be recorded in land records.

(3) Governing instrument means a document recorded in land records that:

(A) establishes a governing body responsible for management of common areas or facilities used by more than one owner of a property interest affected by the document; and

(B) requires contribution, enforceable by a lien on a separate property interest, of a share of taxes, insurance premiums, maintenance, or improvement of, or services or other expenses for the common benefit of, the real property described in the document.

(4) Index means a system that enables a search for a document in land records.

(5) Land records means documents and indexes maintained by a recorder.

(6) Owner means a person that has a fee interest in real property.

(7) Person means an individual, estate, business or nonprofit entity, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or other legal entity.

(8) Record, used as a noun, means information:

(A) inscribed on a tangible medium; or

(B) stored in an electronic or other medium and retrievable in perceivable form.

(9) Recorder means an officer authorized under other law of this state to accept a document for recordation in land records.

(10) Remove means eliminate any apparent or purportedly continuing effect on title to real property.

(11) Unlawful restriction means a prohibition, restriction, covenant, or condition in a document that purports to interfere with or restrict the transfer, use, or occupancy of real property:

(A) on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, familial status, disability, or other personal characteristics; and

(B) in violation of other law of this state or federal law.

Laws 2025, LB21, § 2.